Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 731.
SECTION 2. (1) Credit must be allowed if reinsurance  is ceded to an assuming insurer
that meets each of the conditions set forth below:
(a) The assuming insurer must be  licensed in a reciprocal jurisdiction and have the as-
suming insurer’s home office in, or  be domiciled in, as applicable, the reciprocal jurisdiction.
For purposes of this paragraph, a reciprocal  jurisdiction is a jurisdiction that meets one of
the following:
(A) A jurisdiction outside the United States that is subject to an in-force  covered agree-
ment with the United States, each within the jurisdiction’s legal authority or, in the case
of a covered agreement between the United States and the European  Union, is a member
state of the European Union.  For purposes of this subparagraph, a covered agreement is an
agreement entered into  under the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection
Act, 31 U.S.C. 313 and 314, that is  currently in effect or in a period of provisional application
and that addresses the elimination, under specified conditions,  of collateral requirements as
a condition for entering into  any reinsurance agreement with a ceding insurer domiciled in
this state or for allowing the ceding insurer to recognize credit for reinsurance.
(B) A United States  jurisdiction that meets the requirements for accreditation under the
National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Financial Regulation Standards and  Ac-
creditation Program.
(C) A qualified jurisdiction, as the Director of the Department of Consumer  and Business
Services determines in accordance with  ORS 731.511 (5), that is not otherwise described in
subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph and that meets other requirements the director
specifies by rule that are consistent  with the terms and conditions of in-force covered
agreements.
(b) The assuming insurer must have and maintain, on an ongoing basis, minimum  capital
and surplus, or an equivalent, calculated according to the methodology  of the assuming
insurer’s domiciliary jurisdiction, in an amount set forth in  rule. If the assuming insurer is
an association, including incorporated and individual unincorporated underwriters, the as-
suming insurer must have and maintain, on an ongoing basis,  minimum capital and surplus
equivalents, net of liabilities, calculated according to the methodology applicable  in the as-
Enrolled House Bill 2045 (HB 2045-A) Page 1
suming insurer’s domiciliary jurisdiction, and a  central fund containing a balance in amounts
set forth in rule.
(c) The assuming insurer must have and maintain, on an  ongoing basis, a minimum
solvency or capital ratio, as applicable, that  is set forth in rule. If the assuming insurer is
an association, including incorporated and individual unincorporated underwriters, the as-
suming insurer must have and maintain, on an ongoing basis, a  minimum solvency or capital
ratio in the reciprocal jurisdiction where  the assuming insurer is licensed and has the as-
suming insurer’s head office or is domiciled.
(d) The assuming  insurer must agree and provide adequate assurance to the director, in
a form the director specifies by rule, as follows:
(A) The assuming insurer must provide prompt written notice and  explanation to the
director if the assuming insurer  falls below the minimum requirements set forth in para-
graph (b) or (c) of this subsection or if any regulatory  action is taken against the assuming
insurer for serious noncompliance with applicable law.
(B) The assuming insurer must consent  in writing to the jurisdiction of the courts of this
state and to the appointment of the director as agent for service  of process. The director
may require that consent for service of process be provided to the director  and included in
each reinsurance agreement.  This subparagraph does not limit or in any way alter the ca-
pacity of parties to a reinsurance  agreement to agree to alternative dispute resolution
mechanisms, except to the extent that such agreements are unenforceable under  applicable
insolvency or delinquency laws.
(C) Wherever enforcement is sought, the  assuming insurer must consent in writing to
pay all final judgments that  a ceding insurer or the ceding insurer’s successor obtains in a
jurisdiction that has declared the final judgment enforceable.
(D) Each reinsurance agreement  must include a provision requiring the assuming insurer
to provide security in  an amount equal to 100 percent of the assuming insurer’s liabilities
attributable to reinsurance ceded under the reinsurance agreement if the assuming insurer
resists enforcement of a final judgment that is enforceable under the law of  the jurisdiction
in which the final judgment was obtained  or of a properly enforceable arbitration award,
whether the ceding insurer or the ceding insurer’s  legal successor obtains the final judgment
or arbitration award on behalf  of the ceding insurer or the ceding insurer’s resolution estate.
(E) The assuming insurer must  confirm that the assuming insurer is not presently par-
ticipating in any solvent scheme of arrangement that involves this state’s ceding  insurers
and, if the assuming insurer does enter  into a solvent scheme of arrangement, must agree
to notify the ceding insurer and the director and provide security in an amount equal  to 100
percent of the assuming insurer’s liabilities to the ceding insurer. The security  must be in
a form that the  director specifies by rule consistent with the provisions of ORS 731.510 and
731.511.
(e) At the director’s request, the assuming insurer or the assuming insurer’s legal suc-
cessor must provide on  the assuming insurer’s behalf and on behalf of any of the assuming
insurer’s legal predecessors, documentation the director specifies by rule.
(f) The assuming insurer must maintain a practice of prompt payment of claims under
reinsurance agreements in accordance with criteria the director specifies by rule.
(g) The assuming insurer’s supervisory authority must confirm to the  director every
year, as of the preceding December 31 or on the annual date otherwise  statutorily reported
to the reciprocal jurisdiction, that the assuming insurer complies with the requirements set
forth in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection.
(h) This subsection does not preclude  an assuming insurer from providing the director
with information on a voluntary basis.
(2) The director shall timely create and publish a  list of reciprocal jurisdictions as fol-
lows:
Enrolled House Bill 2045 (HB 2045-A) Page 2
(a) The director’s list must include any reciprocal jurisdiction described  in subsection
(1)(a)(A) and (B) of this section, and the director shall consider for  inclusion in the list any
other reciprocal jurisdiction included on the list of reciprocal jurisdictions that the  National
Association of Insurance Commissioners  publishes. The director may include on the
director’s list  a jurisdiction that does not appear on the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners’ list in accordance with criteria the director specifies by rule.
(b) The director may remove a jurisdiction  from the list the director publishes after de-
termining, in accordance with a process the  director specifies by rule, that the jurisdiction
no longer meets the requirements of a reciprocal jurisdiction, except that the director may
not remove from the list a reciprocal jurisdiction  described in subsection (1)(a)(A) and (B)
of this section. The director shall allow credit for reinsurance ceded to an assuming insurer
that has a home office in, or is domiciled in,  a jurisdiction the director removed from the
director’s list of reciprocal jurisdictions, if  otherwise allowed under applicable provisions of
the Insurance Code.
(3) The director shall timely create and publish a list of assuming insurers that have
satisfied the conditions set forth in this section and to which cessions will be granted  credit
in accordance with this  section. The director may add an assuming insurer to the list if a
jurisdiction that the National Association of Insurance Commissioners has accredited  has
added the assuming insurer to the jurisdiction’s list of assuming insurers or if, upon  initial
eligibility, the assuming insurer submits information to the director as required under sub-
section (1)(d) of  this section and complies with any additional requirements that the director
may impose by rule, except to the extent that  the additional requirements conflict with an
applicable covered agreement.
(4) If the director determines that an assuming  insurer no longer meets one or more of
the requirements under this section, the  director may revoke or suspend the eligibility of the
assuming insurer for recognition under this section in accordance with procedures  the di-
rector specifies by rule. The effect of the director’s revocation or suspension is:
(a) A reinsurance agreement  issued, amended or renewed after the effective date of the
assuming insurer’s suspension does not qualify for credit except to the extent  that the as-
suming insurer’s obligations under the reinsurance agreement are secured in accordance
with ORS 731.510 and rules the director adopts.
(b) Credit for  reinsurance after the effective date of the assuming insurer’s revocation
of eligibility may not be granted with  respect to any reinsurance agreements the assuming
insurer entered into, including reinsurance agreements  the assuming insurer entered into
before the effective date of the revocation, except to the extent that the assuming insurer’s
obligations under the reinsurance agreement are secured consistent  with the provisions of
ORS 731.510 and rules the director adopts.
(5) If subject to a legal process of rehabilitation, liquidation or conservation,  as applica-
ble, the ceding insurer or a representative of the ceding insurer may seek and obtain an or-
der requiring that the assuming insurer  post security for all outstanding ceded liabilities, if
the court in which the proceedings are pending determines that the order is appropriate.
(6) This section does not  limit or in any way alter the capacity of parties to a reinsurance
agreement to agree on requirements for security or other terms in the  reinsurance agree-
ment, except as expressly prohibited under the Insurance Code  or other applicable law, rule
or regulation.
(7)(a) Credit may be taken under this  section only for reinsurance agreements entered
into, amended or renewed on or after the effective date of this 2021 Act and only with respect
to losses incurred and reserves reported on or after the later of:
(A) The date on which the assuming insurer has  met all eligibility requirements under
subsection (1) of this section; and
(B) The effective date of the new reinsurance agreement, amendment or renewal.
Enrolled House Bill 2045 (HB 2045-A) Page 3
(b) This subsection does not alter or impair a ceding insurer’s  right to take credit for
reinsurance, to  the extent that credit is not available under this section, as long as the re-
insurance qualifies for credit under any other applicable provision of the Insurance Code.
(8) This section does not:
(a) Authorize  an assuming insurer to withdraw or reduce the security provided under any
reinsurance agreement, except as permitted by the terms of the reinsurance agreement; or
(b) Limit  or in any way alter the capacity of parties to any reinsurance agreement to
renegotiate the reinsurance agreement.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 731.511 is amended to read:
731.511. (1) For purposes of allowing credit to a ceding  domestic insurer under ORS 731.509 if
the reinsurance is ceded to an  assuming insurer that is accredited as a reinsurer in this state, an
insurer may be accredited as a reinsurer in this state if the insurer:
(a) Files and maintains with  the Director of the Department of Consumer and Business Services
evidence of the insurer’s submission to the jurisdiction of this state;
(b) Submits to the authority of the director to examine the insurer’s books and records;
(c) Is authorized or licensed to transact insurance or reinsurance in at least one state or, in  the
case of a United States branch of an alien assuming insurer, is entered through and authorized or
licensed to transact insurance or reinsurance in at least one state;
(d) Files annually with the director  a copy of the insurer’s annual statement filed with the in-
surance department of the insurer’s state of  domicile and a copy of the insurer’s most recent audited
financial statement; and
(e) Satisfies either of the following requirements:
(A) Maintains combined  capital and surplus in an amount that is not less than $20,000,000. An
application for accreditation by an insurer who maintains the amount  of combined capital and sur-
plus specified in this subparagraph is approved if the application is  not disapproved on or before the
90th day after the application is complete and is filed with the director.
(B) Maintains combined  capital and surplus in an amount less than $20,000,000. An insurer ap-
plying for accreditation [ who] that maintains  the amount of combined capital and surplus specified
in this subparagraph is not accredited until the director approves the application  for accreditation
[is approved by the director ].
(2) An  insurer that is accredited as a reinsurer in this state may accept reinsurance only of
those risks and retain the risk of the reinsurance within such limits as the accredited  reinsurer is
otherwise authorized to insure directly in a state in  which the accredited reinsurer is authorized
or licensed to transact insurance.
(3) The director may revoke the accreditation of an assuming insurer  if the director determines
that the assuming  insurer has failed to continue to meet any of the requirements of subsection (1)
of this section.
(4)(a) The director  shall allow credit if the reinsurance is ceded to an assuming insurer that the
director certifies has:
(A) Maintained a minimum  amount of capital and a surplus, or the equivalent, in an amount the
director specifies by rule;
(B) Maintained a financial strength rating  from two or more rating agencies that the director
by rule deems acceptable for this purpose;
(C) Agreed to submit to the jurisdiction  of the state, to appoint the director as the assuming
insurer’s agent for  the service of process in this state and to provide security for 100 percent of the
assuming insurer’s liabilities that  are attributable to reinsurance that ceding insurers have ceded,
if the assuming insurer resists enforcement of a United States judgment;
(D) Agreed to meet applicable information filing  requirements that the director specifies by rule;
(E) Included a covenant in the language of any trust the  assuming insurer maintains to secure
the assuming insurer’s obligations under ORS 731.509 (8), and in the language of an agreement be-
tween the assuming insurer and the  commissioner with principal regulatory authority over the as-
Enrolled House Bill 2045 (HB 2045-A) Page 4
suming insurer, that requires the assuming insurer to  fund out of the remaining surplus of the trust
any deficiency in a trust account that terminates; and
(F) Satisfied any other requirements that the director specifies for certification.
(b) The director may accredit an association as  a reinsurer, including an incorporated under-
writer or individual  unincorporated underwriters, if the association, the incorporated underwriter
or the individual unincorporated underwriter, as appropriate, meets the requirements  set forth in
paragraph (a) of this subsection and, in addition:
(A) Satisfies minimum capital and surplus requirements by means of the  capital and surplus
equivalents, net of liabilities, of the association and the  association’s members, which must include
a joint central fund with an amount that the director determines is adequate  to satisfy any unsat-
isfied obligation of the association or a member of the association;
(B) Does not engage, as an  incorporated member of the association, in any business other than
underwriting and is subject to the same level of regulation and solvency control as  the association’s
unincorporated members are under the association’s domiciliary regulator; and
(C) Provides to the director each year, within 90 days after  the association must file financial
statements with the  association’s domiciliary regulator, a certification from the association’s
domiciliary regulator as to the solvency of each underwriting member of the  association or, if a
certification is not available, financial statements of each underwriting member of the  association
that certified public accounts have prepared.
(5)(a) The  director shall publish a list of jurisdictions that the director considers qualified for
the purpose of accrediting as  a reinsurer an assuming insurer that is licensed and domiciled in the
jurisdiction.
(b) To determine whether a domiciliary jurisdiction outside the United  States is qualified for the
purpose described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director shall:
(A) Evaluate and monitor how  appropriate and effective the jurisdiction’s insurance supervisory
system is  and the extent to which the jurisdiction affords reinsurers that are licensed and domiciled
in the United States rights, benefits and reciprocal recognition;
(B) Require that the jurisdiction share information and cooperate with the director in  any mat-
ter that concerns a reinsurer that the director  accredits and that is domiciled within the jurisdic-
tion;
(C) Refuse to accredit a jurisdiction if the jurisdiction does  not promptly and adequately enforce
final United States judgments and arbitration awards; and
(D) Consider other criteria the director deems appropriate.
(c) To determine whether a domiciliary jurisdiction inside the United States is qualified for  the
purpose described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the director shall:
(A) Consider the list of qualified jurisdictions that the National Association of Insurance  Com-
missioners publishes and, if  the director accredits a jurisdiction that does not appear on the Na-
tional Association of Insurance Commissioners’ list, justify the  director’s accreditation with
appropriate documentation in accordance with rules the director adopts for this purpose; and
(B) Accredit United States jurisdictions that meet the requirements of  the National Association
of Insurance Commissioners’ financial standards and accreditation program.
(d) If an assuming insurer’s domiciliary jurisdiction ceases to qualify under paragraph (b) or  (c)
of this  subsection, the director may suspend indefinitely the assuming insurer’s accreditation as a
reinsurer.
(6)(a) The director by rule shall designate rating agencies upon which the director will rely for
financial strength ratings  for accredited reinsurers and shall give appropriate consideration to the
rating agencies’ financial strength  ratings in assigning ratings to each accredited reinsurer. The
director shall publish a list of the accredited reinsurers together with the  director’s corresponding
rating for each.
(b) An accredited reinsurer shall secure obligations the  accredited reinsurer assumes from ced-
ing insurers at a level that is consistent with the rating the director  assigns and in accordance with
rules the director adopts.
Enrolled House Bill 2045 (HB 2045-A) Page 5
(7)(a) In order for a  ceding domestic insurer to qualify for full financial statement credit for
reinsurance  that  the ceding domestic insurer cedes to an accredited reinsurer, the accredited re-
insurer must  maintain security in a form that is acceptable to the director and that is consistent
with the requirements of ORS 731.510 or maintain security in a trust fund in  accordance with ORS
731.509 (8), except as otherwise provided in this section.
(b) If an accredited reinsurer maintains a trust fund to fully secure the  accredited reinsurer’s
obligations under ORS 731.509 (8) and the trust fund is a multibeneficiary trust, the  accredited re-
insurer shall maintain separate trust accounts for the obligations the accredited reinsurer  incurs
under reinsurance agreements the accredited reinsurer  issued or renewed as an accredited reinsurer
with reduced security, as provided under  this section or under comparable laws of other United
States jurisdictions, and for obligations the accredited  reinsurer incurs that are subject to ORS
731.509 (8).
(c) The minimum trusteed surplus requirements under ORS 731.509  (8) do not apply to an ac-
credited reinsurer that maintains  a multibeneficiary trust for the purpose of securing obligations
under this subsection, except that the trust must  maintain a minimum trusteed surplus of
[$100,000,000] $10,000,000.
(8) The director shall reduce the allowable credit for ceding insurers  by an amount that is
proportionate to any deficiency in the security required  for an accredited reinsurer under this sec-
tion. The director  may also reduce the allowable credit further if the director finds that a material
risk exists that the accredited reinsurer will not pay the accredited reinsurer’s obligations in full
when due.
(9)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the director shall require an  ac-
credited reinsurer that has become inactive or has voluntarily surrendered accreditation as an  ac-
credited reinsurer, or for which  the director has revoked or suspended accreditation, to secure 100
percent of the reinsurer’s obligations.
(b) The security requirement described in paragraph (a) of this subsection does not  apply to an
accredited reinsurer that is inactive, or for which the director  has suspended accreditation, if the
director maintains a high rating for the reinsurer under subsection (6) of this section.
(10) The director may accredit an assuming insurer as a reinsurer in this state if a  jurisdiction
that the National Association of Insurance Commissioners has qualified as meeting the association’s
financial standards and accreditation has certified the assuming insurer as a reinsurer. The  director
may also  assign to the accredited reinsurer the rating that the qualifying jurisdiction assigned to
the accredited reinsurer.
(11) An accredited reinsurer that ceases to assume new business in this state may  apply to the
director to become inactive and to qualify for a reduction  in security for the business the accredited
reinsurer maintains. An inactive  accredited reinsurer shall comply with all other applicable re-
quirements of this  section and the director shall assign a rating to the accredited reinsurer that
accounts for the  reasons that the accredited reinsurer is not assuming new business, if the reasons
are relevant to the rating.
(12)(a) The director may suspend or revoke  an assuming insurer’s accreditation as a reinsurer
in this state if the assuming insurer fails to meet applicable requirements for accreditation.
(b) The director shall give an accredited reinsurer notice and an opportunity for a  hearing be-
fore taking action under paragraph (a) of this subsection and a suspension or revocation is not ef-
fective until after the director’s final order unless:
(A) The accredited reinsurer waives the opportunity for a hearing;
(B) The director  bases the final order on regulatory action by the accredited reinsurer’s
domiciliary jurisdiction or on  the accredited reinsurer’s having voluntarily surrendered or termi-
nated the accredited reinsurer’s authorization to transact insurance or reinsurance in the
domiciliary jurisdiction or in a  jurisdiction whose certification of the reinsurer formed the basis
upon which the director  accredited the reinsurer in this state under subsection (10) of this section;
or
Enrolled House Bill 2045 (HB 2045-A) Page 6
(C) The director finds that an emergency requires immediate action and a  court does not stay
the director’s action.
(13) A reinsurance contract issued or renewed after the director suspends an accredited
reinsurer’s certification does not qualify for credit unless the  reinsurer secures the reinsurer’s ob-
ligations in accordance with ORS 731.510.  The director may not grant credit for reinsurance after
the effective date of the director’s revocation of  accreditation unless the reinsurer secures the
reinsurer’s obligations in accordance  with subsections (6), (7) and (9) of this section or ORS 731.510.
(14) The director may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section including,  but not
limited to, rules that adopt  guidelines, rules, regulations or interpretive letters from the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners that apply to reinsurance collateral  requirements for alien
reinsurers.
SECTION 4.  ORS 731.859 is amended to read:
731.859. (1) On or before April 1 of each year, each foreign or alien insurer shall:
(a) Determine and report to the Director of the Department  of Consumer and Business Services
whether the provisions of the laws of any state  or country require the imposition of the burdens
specified by ORS 731.854;
(b) Compute the amount owing under ORS 731.854; and
(c) Pay to the director that amount.
(2) If the director, during the period in which the  director under ORS 731.836 may collect taxes
owing under this section, finds the amount of such taxes paid by  an insurer to have been incorrect,
the director shall charge or credit the insurer with the difference between the correct  amount of
tax and the amount actually paid.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS 314.835 or 314.840 or any other law concerning the
confidentiality of  tax returns, the Department of Consumer and Business Services may dis-
close to the  Department of Revenue, and the Department of Revenue may disclose to the
Department of Consumer and  Business Services, tax returns and all other information nec-
essary to carry out the provisions of this section and ORS 731.854.
SECTION 5.
This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 9, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 2, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2045 (HB 2045-A) Page 7